California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The establishment of the commission is necessary for the efficient creation and management of a research program to develop improved varieties of blueberries, an integrated approach to manage pests and diseases common to blueberries, and more efficient cultural practices. The commission is also necessary for the efficient development and management of a state, national, and international advertising and promotion program that, combined with the research program, will enhance the
 competitiveness of the California blueberry industry within the national and international marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79203.

The maintenance of the blueberry industry in California is necessary to assure the public of a continuous supply of this important commodity and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the blueberry industry of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79204.

The production and marketing of blueberries produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79205.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of blueberries the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of transportation, pest management, advertising, promotion, food safety, production research, nutrition, marketing research, quality and maturity standards, the collection and dissemination of crop volume and related statistics, and public
 education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79206.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, shall be deemed a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), or any rule of statutory or common law against monopolies or
 combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79207.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of the particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of
 Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [79211. - 79225.]

79211.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79212.

“Advertising and promotion” mean, in addition to their ordinarily accepted meaning, any plan directed toward increasing the sale of blueberries in domestic or foreign markets and trade promotion and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers that affect the marketing of blueberries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79213.

“Blueberries” mean all blueberries produced in California for commercial purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79214.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79215.

“Commission” means the California Blueberry Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79216.

(a) “Districts” consist of the following:

(1) District 1 consists of all counties in the state along the coastline, including San Diego.

(2) District 2 consists of the counties in the state that do not border the coastline and lie north of a line drawn on the north boundaries of the Counties of Fresno, Inyo, and San Benito. 

(3) District 3 consists of all counties in the state that do not border the coastline and lie south of the boundary line set forth in paragraph (2).

(b) The boundaries of any district may be changed and districts may be added or eliminated by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the secretary, so long as proper notice is provided to all persons subject to this chapter prior to the action. The boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79217.

“Ex officio members” are nonvoting members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79218.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79219.

(a) “Handler” means any person who engages, in this state, in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing blueberries that he or she has produced or purchased or acquired from a producer, or that he or she is marketing on behalf of a producer, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise.

(b) When the handler is a corporation or a limited liability company, all of the directors,
 officers, managers, and members of the corporation or limited liability company in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments to which a corporate handler or a handler that is a limited liability company may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director, officer, manager, or member of the corporation or limited liability company.

(c) “Handler” does not include a retailer, except for a retailer who purchases or acquires from any producer, or handles on behalf of any producer, blueberries that were not previously subjected to regulation by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79220.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell or otherwise distribute blueberries into commercial channels or trade resulting in the sale of blueberries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79221.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of blueberries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79222.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” are synonymous terms and mean the period beginning March 1, 2010, to September 30, 2011, and, thereafter, October 1 of any year and extending through September 30 of the following year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 7.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79223.

“Producer” and “grower” are synonymous terms and mean any person who produces or causes to be produced on land totaling more than five acres of blueberries for market and who shall, upon request of the commission, provide proof of commodity sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79224.

“Production research” means any research relating to the production, harvest, and postharvest handling of blueberries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79225.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Blueberry Commission [79231. - 79247.]

79231.

(a) There is in the state government the California Blueberry Commission. Except as provided in subdivision (c), the commission shall be composed of five producers, five handlers, and one public member. Three producer members shall be elected by and from producers within the respective districts, one from each district, and two producer members shall be elected by and from producers on a statewide basis without reference to districts. The handler members shall be elected by and from handlers on a statewide basis without reference to districts. The public member
 shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission. Each entity subject to this chapter is limited to two representatives, one representing producers and one representing handlers.

(b) The secretary and other appropriate persons as determined by the commission shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(c) The commission may modify the number of producers and handlers who serve on the commission by a two-thirds vote of the commission that is concurred in by the secretary, so long as proper notice is provided to all persons subject to this chapter prior to the action and the number of producers and the number of handlers who serve on the commission remain equal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79232.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until such time as the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the
 secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the secretary’s written notice shall be without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, and his or her reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make those activities or functions acceptable to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79233.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79234.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79235.

Except for the ex officio members of the commission, each member of the commission shall have an alternate member elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, shall serve in place of the member on the commission. An alternate member may also serve in place of any other absent member of the same classification, producer or handler, if the member’s alternate is also absent. However, an alternate may not serve in place of more than one absent member at a meeting. An alternate member serving in place of a
 member shall have and be able to exercise all rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification of a member, the alternate for the member, or another alternate of the same classification if the alternate for the member is absent, shall act as a member on the commission until a qualified successor is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79236.

Any vacancy on the commission including, but not limited to, the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled by the appointment of another person, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission. However, the appointee shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the office he or she is to occupy. The qualifications of any person to
 fill a vacancy on the commission shall be certified in writing to the secretary. The secretary shall notify the commission if he or she determines that the person is not qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79237.

A producer member or his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, blueberries for market. The producer member or his or her alternate shall be so qualified during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79238.

A handler member or his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a handler who has a financial interest in handling blueberries for market. The handler member or his or her alternate shall be so qualified during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79239.

The public member, or his or her alternate on the commission, shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the blueberry industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79240.

The term of office of all members of the commission and alternates, except any ex officio member, shall be two years from the date of their election and until their successors are elected, except, that of the first members of the commission, one-half shall serve one year and one-half shall serve two years. The determination of the term of each member shall be made by lot at the time of election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79241.

The commission may sue and be sued and enter into contracts. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79242.

A quorum of the commission is a majority of the producer members and a majority of the handler members on the commission. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute an act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79243.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission. However, the secretary is not entitled to attend an executive session of the commission called for the purpose of discussing potential or actual litigation against the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79244.

No member of the commission or of any committee established by the commission, which may include nonmembers of the commission, shall receive a salary. Except for ex officio government members, the members may receive reasonable and necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79245.

If the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, he or she shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79246.

All moneys received by any person from assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks designated by the commission and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents designated for that purpose. Any authorized agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79247.

The state shall not be liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission, shall be personally liable on the contracts of the commission and no member, alternate member, or employee of the commission shall be responsible individually in any way to any producer, handler, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of
 commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member or alternate member shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member or alternate member of the commission. The liability of the members and alternate members shall be several and not joint, and no member or alternate member shall be liable for the default of any other member or alternate member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [79251. - 79252.]

79251.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend bylaws, rules, regulations, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, or order of the commission. These actions shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Administer and enforce this chapter and perform all acts and
 exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or determined reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers as it determines necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(d) Employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state to perform the functions prescribed by this subdivision under control of the commission. If the person engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the
 conduct and request that corrective, and if appropriate, disciplinary action, be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(e) Fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(f) Appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(g) Establish offices and incur expenses, invest funds, enter into contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as determined necessary by the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(h) Keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which books, records, and accounts shall be subject to
 an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers and handlers of blueberries, and copies of the audit shall be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(i) Promote the sale of blueberries by advertising and any other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for blueberries, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of blueberries.

(j) Educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling blueberries, make market
 surveys and analyses, and present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the marketing of blueberries.

(k) Make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and any other contracts or agreements the commission determines necessary for the promotion of blueberries.

(l) Conduct, and contract with others to conduct, scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from research or elsewhere with respect to cultural and production practices, good agricultural practices, and marketing and distribution of blueberries. In connection with the research, the commission shall have the power to accept contributions of, or to match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and to employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal
 agencies conducting the research.

(m) Collect information and publish and distribute to producers and handlers a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information, including, but not limited to, crop statistics relating to the blueberry industry.

(n) Establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(o) Establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to subdivision (e).

(p) Submit to the secretary for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized under this chapter.

(q) Investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(r) Administer any program authorized in Article 9 (commencing with Section 79301).

(s) Prescribe the form and manner by which proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers and handlers so long as all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(t) Develop and promote good agricultural practices and other food safety practices for the production of blueberries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79252.

(a) To prevent unfair trade practices which are detrimental to California’s blueberry industry, including, but not limited to, deception and misinformation, the commission shall collect and disseminate to any and all interested persons, handler f.o.b. (free on board), market price information based on sales that have occurred.

(b) The identity of each handler reporting information and the information reported under this section shall be kept confidential and not made public under any circumstances. Information that gives industry
 totals, averages, and other similar data may be disclosed by the commission.

(c) The procedure for the collection and dissemination of the information pursuant to this section shall be approved by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [79261. - 79268.]

79261.

(a) Within 15 days after the effective date of this chapter, the secretary shall establish a list of producers and handlers eligible to vote on the implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary shall require that producers and handlers of blueberries in California submit the names, mailing addresses, and the volume of blueberries produced by each producer and handled by each handler during the preceding marketing season. The request for the information shall be in writing. The information shall be filed within 10 days following receipt
 of the written request for information.

(b) Any producer or handler of blueberries whose name does not appear upon the secretary’s list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer or handler. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer or handler from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79262.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds the following in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary:

(a) At least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting produced a majority of the
 total quantity of blueberries produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting produced 65 percent or more of the total quantity of blueberries produced in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers voting in the referendum.

(b) At least 40 percent of the total number of handlers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the handlers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of blueberries handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the handlers who voted in the referendum
 voted in favor of this chapter, and the handlers so voting handled 65 percent or more of the total quantity of blueberries handled in the preceding marketing season by all of the handlers voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79263.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79264.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79265.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 79262, he or she shall so certify and give notice of the vote to all producers and handlers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79266.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this article, he or she shall so certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct another implementation referendum vote one or more years after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79267.

(a) Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall contact all producers and handlers in a manner determined by the secretary for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission. To be eligible for election to the commission, nominees shall present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least three eligible persons.

(b) Subsequent to the first selection of members of the commission, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election
 procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79268.

Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary an amount of funds determined necessary by the secretary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote. Any funds not used for this purpose shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary. Upon establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary and for any
 legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [79271. - 79278.]

79271.

(a) The commission shall, not later than March 1, 2010, or as soon thereafter as possible, establish the assessment to be paid by the producers and handlers for the marketing season. Thereafter, the commission shall, not later than October 1 of each year, or as soon thereafter as possible, establish the assessment to be paid by the producers and handlers for the marketing season. The assessment shall not be more than two and one-half cents ($0.025) per pound for blueberries handled. Of the assessment one-half shall be assessed to producers, and one-half shall
 be assessed to handlers.

(b) An assessment greater than the amounts in this section may not be charged unless it is approved in accordance with the voting requirements of Section 79262.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 8.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

79272.

This chapter does not apply to blueberries produced only for a producer’s home use or to blueberries that are used only for ornamental purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79273.

Every person who handles blueberries shall keep a complete and accurate record of all blueberries handled by him or her with the name of the producer whose blueberries were handled. A producer who delivers or markets blueberries to persons other than to a handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all those blueberries. The records shall contain information required by the commission. The records shall be preserved by the producer or handler for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the
 commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79274.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from any source, including the names and addresses of producers and handlers, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by court order in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that gives only totals, but
 excludes individual information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79275.

The first handler of blueberries being assessed shall deduct the assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer, and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission. A producer who handles blueberries shall pay an assessment directly to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79276.

Every handler shall be personally liable for the payment of the collected assessments from producers, and failure to collect the assessment from any producer shall not exempt the handler from liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79277.

Any assessment that is levied as provided in this chapter is a personal debt of every producer and handler so assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

79278.

(a) Any person who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be past due and, in addition, interest on the unpaid balance at the rate of 1.5 percent per month.

(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to pay any assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount and for a period
 of time specified by the commission as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 366, Sec. 1.   (AB 606)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [79281. - 79287.]

79281.

A civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be levied by the commission upon a person who does any of the following:

(a) Willfully to render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission, or in any way to affect the shipment and marketing of blueberries in order to avoid payment of assessments on the product’s highest value.

(b) Fail to render or furnish a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) When engaged in the shipping or
 processing of blueberries or in the wholesale or retail trade of blueberries, to fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he or she has received blueberries and the quantity so received.
